Foma_files/german.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [1PSGPRES] [2PSGPRES] [3PSGPRES] [1PPLPRES] [2PPLPRES] [3PPLPRES] [PERFPART]

LEXICON Root

Prefix;

LEXICON Prefix

0:ge  Verb;
      Verb;

LEXICON Verb

spielen:spiel VerbInfl;

LEXICON VerbInfl

[1PSGPRES]:e  #;
[2PSGPRES]:st #;
[3PSGPRES]:t  #;
[1PPLPRES]:en #;
[2PPLPRES]:t  #;
[3PPLPRES]:en #;
[PERFPART]:t  #;
